District of Columbia statutes.
8-1711

Annual budget.

The Soil and Water Conservation District shall submit to the Mayor of the District of Columbia an annual budget requesting appropriations for the purpose of implementing this subchapter. Such budget shall be submitted in the same manner as are budgets of other District of Columbia government agencies.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-143, § 12, 29 DCR 3118

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2811.